en: Camemberts from microfiltered cow milk, Camemberts from microfiltered milk
de: Camembert aus mikrofiltrierter Milch
fr: Camemberts au lait microfiltré de vache, Camemberts au lait microfiltré
hr: Camemberta od mikrofiltriranog kravljeg mlijeka
nl: Camemberts van gemicrofiltreerde melk

en: Camemberts from thermized cow milk, Camemberts from thermized milk
de: Camembert aus thermisierter Milch
fr: Camemberts au lait thermisé de vache, Camemberts au lait thermisé
hr: Camemberti od termiziranog kravljeg mlijeka
nl: Camemberts op basis van gethermiseerde melk

en: Camemberts from pasteurized cow milk, Pasteurized camembert
de: Pasteurisierter Camembert
es: Camembert pasteurizado
fi: Pastöroitu Camambert
fr: Camemberts au lait pasteurisé de vache, Camemberts pasteurisés, camembert pasteurisé
hr: Camemberta od pasteriziranog kravljeg mlijeka
hu: Pasztőrözött camembert
it: Camembert pastorizzato
nl: Gepasteuriseerde camemberts

en: Camembert with Calvados
de: Camembert mit Calvados
es: Camembert con Calvados
fr: Camembert au calvados
hr: Camembert s calvadosom
nl: Camembert met Calvados

en: Soft-ripened cheese with bloomy rind, Camembert-type cheese
fr: Fromage à pâte molle et croûte fleurie, Fromage de type camembert

en: Soft-ripened round cheese with bloomy rind 5 to 11% fat, Camembert-type cheese with reduced fat
fr: Fromage rond à pâte molle et croûte fleurie 5 à 11% MG, Fromage de type Camembert allégé en matière grasse

en: Soft-ripened cheese triple cream around 40% fat
fr: Fromage à pâte molle triple crème environ 40% MG

en: Soft-ripened washed-rind cheese reduced fat around 13% fat
fr: Fromage à pâte molle et croûte lavée allégé environ 13% MG

en: Soft -ripened washed bloomy and coloured rind cheese
fr: Fromage à pâte molle et croûte mixte (lavée et fleurie) colorée

en: Soft-ripened cheese double cream around 30% fat
fr: Fromage à pâte molle double crème environ 30% MG

en: Soft-ripened round cheese with bloomy rind around 5% fat Camembert-type cheese reduced fat
fr: Fromage rond à pâte molle et croûte fleurie environ 5% MG type camembert allégé en matière grasse

en: Soft-ripened washed-rind cheese from pasteurised milk, Vieux pané-type cheese
fr: Fromage à pâte molle à croûte lavée au lait pasteurisé, Fromage de type Vieux Pané

en: Emmentaler, Emmenthal, Emmental
xx: Emmental
bg: Ементал
ca: Emmental
da: Emmentaler
de: Emmentaler
es: Emmental
fi: Emmental
fr: Emmentals, emmenthal, emmentaler
hr: Emental
hu: Ementáli
it: Emmental, emmenthal, emmentaler
ja: エメンタールチーズ
nl: Emmentalers

en: Hard cheese emmental-type cheese reduced fat
fr: Fromage de type emmental, Fromage de type emmenthal

en: Emmental slices
fr: Emmental en tranches
nl: Emmental in plakjes

fr: Emmentals suisses
de: Schweizer Emmentaler
nl: Zwiterse kazen

en: Swiss Gruyères
de: Greyerzer
fi: sveitsiläiset Gruyèret
fr: Gruyères de Suisse, Gruyères suisses, Gruyères suisses AOP, Gruyères AOP
hr: Švicarski gruyères
it: Formaggi Gruviera svizzeri
nl: Zwitserse Gruyère

en: Appenzeller cheese
xx: Appenzeller
bg: Апанзел
de: Appenzeller
fr: Appenzeller
hr: Appenzeller
it: Formaggio dell'Appenzello
ja: アッペンツェラー
nl: Appenzeller

fr: Vacherin fribourgeois
de: Vacherin fribourgeois

en: Swiss Vacherin Mont-d'Or
fr: Vacherin Mont-d'Or suisse